Montana, session 2025, HB849.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Special motorcycle license plates -- department OF JUSTICE to design -- fees --
distribution. (1) A Montana resident who is the owner of a motorcycle or quadricycle titled and registered
under this chapter and who pays the fee required under subsection (2) may be issued a special motorcycle
license plate bearing a black background and a design created by the department of justice. The design must
recognize the efforts of one or more Montana-based nonprofit organizations dedicated to motorcycle rider
safety and awareness.
(2) A person requesting a special motorcycle license plate under this section shall pay to the
county treasurer or an authorized agent:
(a) an administrative fee of $5 on issuance of the special license plate to be deposited in the
county general fund;
(b) a $5 license plate fee; and
(c) a donation fee of $20.
(3) The county treasurer or an authorized agent shall remit the fees required in subsections (2)(b)
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 849
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 849
and (2)(c) to the department of justice. For each special plate issued, the department of justice shall deposit $5
in the state general fund and $20 in an account in the state special revenue fund to be used by the department
of transportation as provided in subsection (4).
(4) The department of transportation shall use the money deposited in the account in the state
special revenue fund as provided in subsection (3) to provide grants, using criteria established by the
department of transportation, to Montana-based nonprofit organizations that promote awareness and enhance
education regarding motorcycle safety.
(5) The account in the state special revenue fund provided for in subsection (3) is statutorily
appropriated to the department of transportation, as provided in 17-7-502.
Section 2. Section 17-7-502, MCA, is amended to read:
"17-7-502. Statutory appropriations -- definition -- requisites for validity. (1) A statutory
appropriation is an appropriation made by permanent law that authorizes spending by a state agency without
the need for a biennial legislative appropriation or budget amendment.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4), to be effective, a statutory appropriation must comply with
both of the following provisions:
(a) The law containing the statutory authority must be listed in subsection (3).
(b) The law or portion of the law making a statutory appropriation must specifically state that a
statutory appropriation is made as provided in this section.
(3) The following laws are the only laws containing statutory appropriations: 2-17-105; 5-11-120; 5-
11-407; 5-13-403; 5-13-404; 7-4-2502; 7-4-2924; 7-32-236; 10-1-108; 10-1-1202; 10-1-1303; 10-2-603; 10-2-
807; 10-3-203; 10-3-310; 10-3-312; 10-3-314; 10-3-316; 10-3-802; 10-3-1304; 10-4-304; 10-4-310; 15-1-121;
15-1-142; 15-1-143; 15-1-218; 15-1-2302; 15-31-165; 15-31-1004; 15-31-1005; 15-35-108; 15-36-332; 15-37-
117; 15-39-110; 15-65-121; 15-70-128; 15-70-131; 15-70-132; 15-70-433; 16-11-119; 16-11-509; 17-3-106; 17-
3-212; 17-3-222; 17-3-241; 17-6-101; 17-6-214; 17-7-133; 17-7-215; 18-11-112; 19-3-319; 19-3-320; 19-6-410;
19-9-702; 19-13-604; 19-17-301; 19-18-512; 19-19-305; 19-19-506; 19-20-604; 19-20-607; 19-21-203; 20-3-
369; 20-7-1709; 20-8-107; 20-9-250; 20-9-534; 20-9-622; [20-15-328]; 20-26-617; 20-26-1503; 22-1-327; 22-3-
116; 22-3-117; [22-3-1004]; 23-4-105; 23-5-306; 23-5-409; 23-5-612; 23-7-301; 23-7-402; 30-10-1004; 37-43-
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 849
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 849
204; 37-50-209; 37-54-113; 39-71-503; 41-5-2011; 42-2-105; 44-4-1101; 44-4-1506; 44-12-213; 44-13-102; 50-
1-115; 53-1-109; 53-6-148; 53-9-113; 53-24-108; 53-24-206; 60-5-530; 60-11-115; 61-3-321; 61-3-415; [section
1]; 67-1-309; 69-3-870; 69-4-527; 75-1-1101; 75-5-1108; 75-6-214; 75-11-313; 75-26-308; 76-13-150; 76-13-
151; 76-13-417; 76-17-103; 77-1-108; 77-2-362; 80-2-222; 80-4-416; 80-11-518; 80-11-1006; 81-1-112; 81-1-
113; 81-2-203; 81-7-106; 81-7-123; 81-10-103; 82-11-161; 85-20-1504; 85-20-1505; [85-25-102]; 87-1-603; 87-
5-909; 90-1-115; 90-1-205; 90-1-504; 90-6-331; and 90-9-306.
(4) There is a statutory appropriation to pay the principal, interest, premiums, and any costs or fees
associated with issuing, paying, securing, redeeming, or defeasing all bonds, notes, or other obligations, as due
in the ordinary course or when earlier called for redemption or defeased, that have been authorized and issued
pursuant to the laws of Montana. Agencies that have entered into agreements authorized by the laws of
Montana to pay the state treasurer, for deposit in accordance with 17-2-101 through 17-2-107, as determined
by the state treasurer, an amount sufficient to pay the principal and interest as due on the bonds or notes have
statutory appropriation authority for the payments. (In subsection (3): pursuant to sec. 10, Ch. 360, L. 1999, the
inclusion of 19-20-604 terminates contingently when the amortization period for the teachers' retirement
system's unfunded liability is 10 years or less; pursuant to sec. 73, Ch. 44, L. 2007, the inclusion of 19-6-410
terminates contingently upon the death of the last recipient eligible under 19-6-709(2) for the supplemental
benefit provided by 19-6-709; pursuant to sec. 5, Ch. 383, L. 2015, the inclusion of 85-25-102 is effective on
occurrence of contingency; pursuant to sec. 6, Ch. 423, L. 2015, the inclusion of 22-3-116 and 22-3-117
terminates June 30, 2025; pursuant to sec. 4, Ch. 122, L. 2017, the inclusion of 10-3-1304 terminates
September 30, 2025; pursuant to sec. 1, Ch. 213, L. 2017, the inclusion of 90-6-331 terminates June 30, 2027;
pursuant to sec. 10, Ch. 374, L. 2017, the inclusion of 76-17-103 terminates June 30, 2027; pursuant to secs.
11, 12, and 14, Ch. 343, L. 2019, the inclusion of 15-35-108 terminates June 30, 2027; pursuant to sec. 1, Ch.
408, L. 2019, the inclusion of 17-7-215 terminates June 30, 2029; pursuant to secs. 1, 2, 3, Ch. 139, L. 2021,
the inclusion of 53-9-113 terminates June 30, 2027; pursuant to sec. 8, Ch. 200, L. 2021, the inclusion of 10-4-
310 terminates July 1, 2031; pursuant to secs. 3, 4, Ch. 404, L. 2021, the inclusion of 30-10-1004 terminates
June 30, 2027; pursuant to sec. 5, Ch. 548, L. 2021, the inclusion of 50-1-115 terminates June 30, 2025;
pursuant to secs. 5 and 12, Ch. 563, L. 2021, the inclusion of 22-3-1004 is effective July 1, 2027; pursuant to
sec. 1, Ch. 20, L. 2023, sec. 2, Ch. 20, L. 2023, and sec. 3, Ch. 20, L. 2023, the inclusion of 81-1-112, 81-1-
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 849
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 849
113, and 81-7-106 terminates June 30, 2029; pursuant to sec. 9, Ch. 44, L. 2023, the inclusion of 15-1-142
terminates December 31, 2025; pursuant to sec. 10, Ch. 47, L. 2023, the inclusion of 15-1-2302 terminates
June 30, 2025; pursuant to sec. 2, Ch. 374, L. 2023, the inclusion of 10-3-802 terminates June 30, 2031;
pursuant to sec. 12, Ch. 558, L. 2023, the inclusion of 20-9-250 terminates December 31, 2029; pursuant to
sec. 4, Ch. 621, L. 2023, the inclusion of 22-1-327 terminates July 1, 2029; pursuant to sec. 24, Ch. 722, L.
2023, the inclusion of 17-7-133 terminates June 30, 2027; pursuant to sec. 10, Ch. 758, L. 2023, the inclusion
of 44-4-1506 terminates June 30, 2027; and pursuant to sec. 10, Ch. 764, L. 2023, the inclusion of 15-1-143
terminates December 31, 2025.)"
Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
61, chapter 3, part 4, and the provisions of Title 61, chapter 3, part 4, apply to [section 1].
Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective January 1, 2026.
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 849
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 849, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 849
INTRODUCED BY J. SECKINGER, R. TEMPEL, B. USHER, P. FLOWERS, G. LAMMERS, S. NOVAK, D.
HARVEY, E. BOLDMAN, K. ZOLNIKOV, E. BYRNE, B. CARTER, B. EDWARDS, S. ESSMANN, L. JONES, J.
LYNCH, E. MATTHEWS, B. MERCER, T. MILLETT, R. MINER, B. MITCHELL, G. NIKOLAKAKOS, G.
OBLANDER, S. ROSENZWEIG, M. THIEL, E. TILLEMAN
AN ACT PROVIDING FOR SPECIAL MOTORCYCLE LICENSE PLATES FOR PROMOTING MOTORCYCLE
SAFETY AND AWARENESS; ESTABLISHING A FEE FOR THE SPECIAL MOTORCYCLE LICENSE PLATES
AND REQUIRING THAT THE PROCEEDS BE USED FOR GRANTS TO NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS
IDENTIFIED BY RULES ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION; STATUTORILY APPROPRIATING THE FEE PROCEEDS TO THE DEPARTMENT OF
JUSTICE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION; PROVIDING RULEMAKING AUTHORITY; PROVIDING A
STATUTORY APPROPRIATION; AMENDING SECTION 17-7-502, MCA; AND PROVIDING A DELAYED
EFFECTIVE DATE.”